th: ระดับการอบโอ๊ค: คั่วเข้ม; คั่วอ่อน; คั่วกลาง; คั่วกลางค่อนข้างเข้ม; ไม่คั่ว; อื่นๆ
de: Röstgrad des Eichenholzes: Starke Röstung; Leichte Röstung; Mittlere Röstung; Medium-Plus-Röstung; Ungeröstet; Andere
es: Nivel de tostado del roble: Tostado intenso; Tostado ligero; Tostado medio; Tostado medio alto; Sin tostar; Otro
zh-CN: 橡木烘烤程度: 重度烘烤; 轻度烘烤; 中度烘烤; 中重度烘烤; 未烘烤; 其他
ja: オークトーストレベル: ヘビートースト; ライトトースト; ミディアムトースト; ミディアムプラストースト; 非トースト; その他
pt-BR: Carvalho nível de tosta: Tosta forte; Tosta leve; Tosta média; Tosta média mais; Sem tosta; Outro
sv: Ekrostningsgrad: Kraftigt rostad; Lättrostad; Mediumrostad; Medium plus-rostad; Orostad; Övrigt
el: Βαθμός καβουρδίσματος δρυός: Έντονο κάψιμο; Ελαφρύ κάψιμο; Μέτριο κάψιμο; Μέτριο προς έντονο κάψιμο; Χωρίς κάψιμο; Άλλο
pt-PT: nível de tostagem de carvalho: Tosta forte; Tosta ligeira; Tosta média; Tosta média mais; Sem tosta; Outro
da: Toastningsgrad for eg: Hårdt ristet; Let ristet; Medium ristet; Medium plus ristet; Uristet; Andet
cs: Stupeň vypálení dubového dřeva: Silně vypálené; Lehce vypálené; Středně vypálené; Středně silně vypálené; Nevypálené; Ostatní
it: Livello di tostatura del rovere: Tostatura forte; Tostatura leggera; Tostatura media; Tostatura medio-forte; Non tostato; Altro
en: Oak toast level: Heavy toast; Light toast; Medium toast; Medium-plus toast; Untoasted; Other
vi: Mức độ nướng gỗ sồi: Nướng kỹ; Nướng sơ; Nướng vừa; Nướng vừa đến kỹ; Không nướng; Khác
bg-BG: Ниво на изпичане на дъба: Силно изпичане; Леко изпичане; Средно изпичане; Средно плюс изпичане; Без изпичане; Друго
tr: Meşe kavurma seviyesi: Koyu kavrulmuş; Az kavrulmuş; Orta kavrulmuş; Orta üstü kavrulmuş; Kavrulmamış; Diğer
sk-SK: Stupeň vypálenia dubového dreva: Silné vypálenie; Jemné vypálenie; Stredné vypálenie; Stredné plus vypálenie; Nevypálené; Iné
ko: 오크 토스팅 정도: 헤비 토스트; 라이트 토스트; 미디엄 토스트; 미디엄 플러스 토스트; 언토스트; 기타
ru: Степень обжига дуба: Сильный обжиг; Слабый обжиг; Средний обжиг; Средний плюс обжиг; Без обжига; Другое
nl: Eikenhout roosterniveau: Zwaar getoast; Licht getoast; Medium getoast; Medium-plus getoast; Niet getoast; Overig
zh-TW: 橡木烘烤程度: 重度烘烤; 輕度烘烤; 中度烘烤; 中度偏重烘烤; 無烘烤; 其他
hu: Tölgyfahordó pörkölési szintje: Erős pörkölés; Enyhe pörkölés; Közepes pörkölés; Közepesen erős pörkölés; Pörköletlen; Egyéb
ro-RO: Nivel de prăjire a stejarului: Prăjire intensă; Prăjire ușoară; Prăjire medie; Prăjire medie-plus; Neprăjit; Altele
hr-HR: Razina tosta hrasta: Jako tostirano; Lagano tostirano; Srednje tostirano; Srednje do jako tostirano; Netostirano; Ostalo
fi: Tammen paahtoaste: Vahva paahto; Kevyt paahto; Keskipaahto; Keskivahva paahto; Paahtamaton; Muu
lt-LT: Ąžuolo skrudinimo lygis: Stipriai skrudinta; Švelniai skrudinta; Vidutiniškai skrudinta; Vidutiniškai-stipriai skrudinta; Neskrudinta; Kita
fr: Niveau de chauffe du chêne: Chauffe forte; Chauffe légère; Chauffe moyenne; Chauffe moyenne plus; Non chauffé; Autre
pl: Stopień opiekania dębu: Mocno opiekane; Lekko opiekane; Średnio opiekane; Średnio plus opiekane; Nieopiekane; Inne
nb: Eikebrødnivå: Sterkt brent; Lett brent; Medium brent; Medium-pluss brent; Ubrent; Annet
sl-SI: Stopnja osmoditve hrasta: Močno opečen; Rahlo opečen; Srednje opečen; Srednje močno opečen; Neopečen; Drugo